Utah statutes.
19-6-822.   Criminal penalties.

A knowing violation of any applicable provision of this part is a third degree felony, except that any violation:

(1)  involving hazardous waste is governed by Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 1, Solid and Hazardous Waste Act;

(2)  of Subsection 19-6-804(1) or (3) is subject only to the civil penalties in Subsection 19-6-804(4); and

(3)  of Subsection 19-6-808(1), (2), or (3) is subject to the penalties under Subsection 19-6-808(4).

